Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 73 Arkansas Trust Code
28-73-410. Modification or termination of trust — Proceedings for approval or disapproval.

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by §§ 28-73-411 — 28-73-414, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved, or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible to achieve.

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under §§ 28-73-411 — 28-73-416, or trust combination or division under § 28-73-417, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary, and a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under § 28-73-411 may be commenced by the settlor. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under § 28-73-413.

terminated upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if a court concludes that continuance of the trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of the trust; or

modified upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if a court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

A spendthrift provision in the terms of the trust is presumed to constitute a material purpose of the trust.

Upon termination of a trust under subsection (a) or (b), the trustee shall distribute the trust property as agreed by the beneficiaries.

If not all of the beneficiaries consent to a proposed modification or termination of the trust under subsection (a) or (b), the modification or termination may be approved by a court if the court is satisfied that:

if all of the beneficiaries had consented, the trust could have been modified or terminated under this section; and

the interests of a beneficiary who does not consent will be adequately protected.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 411(c) of the Uniform Trust Code (ULA 2005) differs from the version of this section as enacted in Arkansas.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

Consent of a secondary beneficiary to trust amendments was not required because the express terms of the trusts permitted the amendments at issue.Dawson v. Stoner-Sellers, 2019 Ark. 410, 591 S.W.3d 299 (2019).

Circuit court did not err in granting a motion for directed verdict in an action to terminate a trust, because the beneficiary failed to meet her burden of proof under the statutory procedures set forth in §§28-69-401,28-73-411; there was no evidence of a change in circumstances between the establishment of the trust and the settlor's death that would frustrate the purpose of the trust. Neither the timing of the settlor's death, nor the fact that the beneficiary had to disrupt her employment to care for her mother were unforeseen circumstances that frustrated the purpose of the trust.Buckalew v. Arvest Trust Co., N.A., 2013 Ark. App. 28, 425 S.W.3d 819 (2013).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

Cited: In re Ruby G. Owen Trust, 2012 Ark. App. 381, 418 S.W.3d 421 (2012).

a court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner consistent with the settlor's charitable purposes.

While the regional medical center was not the same entity as the hospital that the decedent left the remainder of his property to if the named beneficiaries predeceased him, the regional medical center was the appropriate cy pres beneficiary because the entity that operated the hospital was the intended object of the decedent's bequest and the decedent had the charitable intent to promote public health when he made the devise to the hospital. Thus, the circuit court did not err in deciding that the decedent's estate should be used to further the patient-care and community programs that a new clinic would provide the community, and it fashioned a use for the funds as near to the decedent's intent as possible under the circumstances.In re Estate of Alexander, 2017 Ark. App. 588, 533 S.W.3d 618 (2017).

Circuit court erred in applying the cy pres doctrine to reform a testamentary trust because the testator created the trust for the administration of four life estates with the remainder to two churches, which vested on the testator's death, there was no provision that the devise was to serve a charitable purpose or that restricted the churches from using the proceeds for noncharitable purposes, and neither the trustee nor the churches was directed to ensure that the use of the property be for a purpose benefiting any charity.Covenant Presbytery v. First Baptist Church, 2016 Ark. 138, 489 S.W.3d 153 (2016).

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-411. Modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent.

(1)A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified or terminated upon consent of the settlor and all beneficiaries, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

A settlor's power to consent to a trust's modification or termination may be exercised by:

an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the power of attorney or the terms of the trust;

the settlor's conservator with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship if an agent is not so authorized; or

the settlor's guardian with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship if an agent is not so authorized and a conservator has not been appointed.

A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-412. Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

In addition to the procedure available under §28-69-401 et seq., a court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification must be made in accordance with the settlor's probable intention.

A court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust's administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-413. Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if a particular charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful:

the trust does not fail, in whole or in part;

the trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor's successors in interest; and

A provision in the terms of a charitable trust that would result in distribution of the trust property to a noncharitable beneficiary prevails over the power of a court under subsection (a) to apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust only if, when the provision takes effect:

the trust property is to revert to the settlor and the settlor is still living; or

less than thirty (30) years have elapsed since the date of the trust's creation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-414. Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property having a total value less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

A court may modify or terminate a trust or remove the trustee and appoint a different trustee if it determines that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

This section does not apply to an easement for conservation or preservation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-415. Reformation to correct mistakes.

A court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor's intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that both the settlor's intent and the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-416. Modification to achieve settlor's tax objectives.

To achieve the settlor's tax objectives, a court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor's probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-417. Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

A trustee may exercise the authority granted in this section without court approval.

This section does not repeal the Trustee Division of Trusts Act, § 28-69-701 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Creditor's Claims — Spendthrift and Discretionary Trusts

28-73-501. Rights of beneficiary's creditor or assignee.

To the extent a beneficiary's interest is not protected by a spendthrift provision, a court may authorize a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary to reach the beneficiary's interest by attachment of present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary or other means. The court may limit the award to such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-502. Spendthrift provision.

A spendthrift provision is valid only if it restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest.

A term of a trust providing that the interest of a beneficiary is held subject to a “spendthrift trust”, or words of similar import, is sufficient to restrain both voluntary and involuntary transfer of the beneficiary's interest.

A beneficiary may not transfer an interest in a trust in violation of a valid spendthrift provision and, except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary may not reach the interest or a distribution by the trustee before its receipt by the beneficiary.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Ark. L. Rev.

Isabelle V. Taylor, Comment: Creditor Rights and the Missing Link in the Arkansas Trust Code: Is Death Strong Enough “To Break the Chain?”, 65 Ark. L. Rev. 433 (2012).

Although debtor, acting as executrix, retained control over the assets in the testator's estate, and she may have improperly exercised that control in her capacity as executrix, her conduct in that capacity did not invalidate the spendthrift provision; because the spendthrift provision was enforceable under subsection (a) of this section, debtor's interest in the net income from the trust was subject to a restriction on transfer under applicable nonbankruptcy law, the 11 U.S.C.S. § 541(c)(2) exception applied, and debtor's interest in the distributions of net income from the trust was not a part of her bankruptcy estate.Wetzel v. Regions Bank, 649 F.3d 831 (8th Cir. 2011).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 503 of the Uniform Trust Code (ULA 2005), concerning exceptions to a spendthrift provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.

the discretion is expressed in the form of a standard of distribution; or

the trustee has abused the discretion.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 504 of the Uniform Trust Code (ULA 2005) differs from the version of this section as enacted in Arkansas.

an irrevocable trust that is treated as qualified terminable interest property under section 2523(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as in effect on January 1, 2015, if the settlor is a beneficiary of the trust after the death of the settlor's spouse;

an irrevocable trust that is treated as a general power of appointment trust under section 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as in effect on January 1, 2015, if the settlor is a beneficiary of the trust after the death of the settlor's spouse;

an irrevocable trust for the benefit of a person to the extent that the property of the trust was subject to a general power of appointment in another person.

For purposes of this subsection (c), a person is a beneficiary whether named under the initial trust instrument or through the exercise of a limited or general power of appointment by that person's spouse or by another person.

For purposes of subdivision (c)(1)(C) of this section, a general power of appointment means a power of appointment exercisable in favor of the holder of the power, the estate of the holder of the power, a creditor of the holder of the power, or a creditor of the estate of the holder of the power.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the second sentence in (a)(1); rewrote (b)(2); and added (c).

U.S. Code. Section 2041(b)(2), 2514(e) and 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (b)(2), are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 2041(b)(2), 2514(e) and 2503(b) respectively.

Ark. L. Rev.

Isabelle V. Taylor, Comment: Creditor Rights and the Missing Link in the Arkansas Trust Code: Is Death Strong Enough “To Break the Chain?”, 65 Ark. L. Rev. 433 (2012).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-503. [Reserved.]

Whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a creditor of a beneficiary may not compel a distribution that is subject to the trustee's discretion, even if:

This section does not limit the right of a beneficiary to maintain a judicial proceeding against a trustee for an abuse of discretion or failure to comply with a standard for distribution. Under §28-73-814(a), a trustee must always exercise a discretionary power in good faith and with regard to the purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

A creditor may not reach the interest of a beneficiary who is also a trustee or cotrustee, or otherwise compel a distribution, if the trustee's discretion to make distributions for the trustee's own benefit is limited by an ascertainable standard.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-505. Creditor's claim against settlor.

Whether or not the terms of a trust contain a spendthrift provision, the following rules apply:

During the lifetime of the settlor, the property of a revocable trust is subject to claims of the settlor's creditors. If a trust has more than one (1) settlor, the amount the creditor or assignee of a particular settlor may reach may not exceed the settlor's interest in the portion of the trust attributable to that settlor's contribution.

With respect to an irrevocable trust, a creditor or assignee of the settlor may reach the maximum amount that can be distributed to or for the settlor's benefit. If a trust has more than one (1) settlor, the amount the creditor or assignee of a particular settlor may reach may not exceed the settlor's interest in the portion of the trust attributable to that settlor's contribution.

For purposes of this section:

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal is treated in the same manner as the settlor of a revocable trust to the extent of the property subject to the power.

On the lapse, release, or waiver of a power of withdrawal, the holder of a power of withdrawal is not, by reason of any such power of withdrawal, treated as the settlor of the trust.

(1)Subject to §4-59-204, for the purposes of this section, property contributed to the following trusts is not deemed to have been contributed by the settlor, and a person who would otherwise be treated as a settlor or a deemed settlor of the following trusts shall not be treated as a settlor:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1; 2015, No. 396, § 1.

28-73-506. Overdue distribution.

Whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a creditor or assignee of a beneficiary may reach a mandatory distribution of income or principal, including a distribution upon termination of the trust, if the trustee has not made the distribution to the beneficiary within a reasonable time after the designated distribution date.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-507. Personal obligations of trustee.

Trust property is not subject to personal obligations of the trustee, even if the trustee becomes insolvent or bankrupt.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 6

— Revocable Trusts

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

28-73-601. Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-602. Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before September 1, 2005.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one (1) settlor:

to the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

to the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor's contribution; and

upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the settlors, the trustee shall promptly notify the other settlors of the revocation or amendment.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

by substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

if the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

executing a later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

any other method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor's intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs.

A settlor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power.

A conservator of the settlor or, if no conservator has been appointed, a guardian of the settlor may exercise a settlor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship or guardianship.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor's successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Circuit court was not clearly wrong in finding that there was clear and convincing evidence that the decedent had transferred his interest in the partnership to the trust, because an attorney involved in preparing the decedent's estate plan testified as to an exchange of emails in which he described the decedent's interest in the family partnership as being held in the revocable trust.Ashley v. Ashley, 2012 Ark. App. 236, 405 S.W.3d 419 (2012).

Decedent specifically reserved the right as settlor to revoke the revocable trust at any time and manifested her intent to revoke the trust in part when she executed a quitclaim deed to one tract to her son, subsequently amended the revocable trust to except that tract from the trust property, and revoked that trust and created a new revocable trust that made no reference to the tract.Garrett v. Neece, 2019 Ark. App. 178, 574 S.W.3d 686 (2019).

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective until January 1, 2020, see the bound volume.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a); and redesignated former (a) and (b) as (b) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

three (3) years after the settlor's death; or

ninety (90) days after the trustee sent the person a notice informing the person of the trust's existence, the settlor's name, the trustee's name and address, the time allowed for commencing a proceeding, and a description of the beneficiary's interest, if any.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

In a dispute over whether a bank properly declined a trusteeship, the circuit court's order directing the bank to perform an accounting was proper because the bank's actions exceeded the mere preservation of trust property and were instead consistent with exercising powers as trustee; therefore, reliance on the safe harbor provision in this section was unavailing.Bank of the Ozarks v. Cossey (In re Hamilton LivingTrust), 2015 Ark. 367, 471 S.W.3d 203 (2015).

A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the trustees and who notified any cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action is a serious breach of trust.

Circuit court erred in concluding that no real estate transactions could be made without a unanimous decision of the cotrustees or prior court approval as that decision was in direct contravention of subsection (a) of this section, which allowed cotrustees who were unable to achieve unanimity to act by majority rule and was a change from the common law.Wylie v. Shaw (In re GNB III Trust), 2019 Ark. App. 171, 574 S.W.3d 159 (2019).

Circuit court did not err in refusing to approve the sale of a trust property to one cotrustee where the transaction required a higher level of scrutiny under §28-73-802, court approval was required and not just majority agreement, there was conflicting evidence of the property’s value, two cotrustees were interested in purchasing the property and offered differing values, and there was evidence that two cotrustees were trying to exclude the other cotrustee from trust transactions and had not discussed the sale with her before filing the petition.Wylie v. Shaw (In re GNB III Trust), 2019 Ark. App. 171, 574 S.W.3d 159 (2019).

a person designated as trustee rejects the trusteeship;

a person designated as trustee cannot be identified or does not exist;

a trustee resigns;

a trustee is disqualified or removed;

a trustee dies; or

a guardian of the person or conservator is appointed for an individual serving as trustee.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

In litigation brought by a secondary beneficiary over the administration of several family trusts, the circuit court erred by denying plaintiff a jury trial on his legal claims (breach of fiduciary duty, conversion, fraud and concealment, and conspiracy); the clean-up doctrine has been abolished in Arkansas. Plaintiff was not entitled to a jury trial on his equitable claims (removal of trustee and injunctive relief).Dawson v. Stoner-Sellers, 2019 Ark. 410, 591 S.W.3d 299 (2019).

Under this section, only the court, a settlor, cotrustee, or a beneficiary could initiate an action to remove a trustee; an attorney who was named in the trust as the one to select a new trustee in the event the trust administration was moved from Little Rock had no standing to remove the existing trustee.Bank of Am., N.A. v. Brown, 2011 Ark. 446 (2011).

Trial court's award for labor and expenses was reversed and remanded as the trial court had not explained why it awarded the uncontroverted amount submitted by the other trustee for his labor costs, but ignored the uncontroverted amount submitted for reimbursement for materials.Scott v. Scott, 2016 Ark. App. 390, 499 S.W.3d 653 (2016).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-603. Settlor's powers — Powers of withdrawal. [Effective until January 1, 2020.]

While a trust is revocable and the settlor has capacity to revoke the trust, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-603. Settlor's powers — Powers of withdrawal. [Effective January 1, 2020.]

To the extent a trust is revocable by a settlor, a trustee may follow a direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust. To the extent a trust is revocable by a settlor in conjunction with a person other than a trustee or person holding an adverse interest, the trustee may follow a direction from the settlor and the other person holding the power to revoke even if the direction is contrary to the terms of the trust.

While a trust is revocable and the settlor has capacity to revoke the trust, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1; 2019, No. 1021, § 3.

28-73-604. Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust — Distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable at the settlor's death within the earlier of:

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor's death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for the distribution unless:

the trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

a potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within sixty (60) days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been invalid is liable to return any distribution received.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 7

— Office of Trustee

28-73-701. Accepting or declining trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

by substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the terms of the trust; or

if the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may reject the trusteeship. A designated trustee who does not accept the trusteeship within a reasonable time after knowing of the designation is deemed to have rejected the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may:

act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a rejection of the trusteeship to the settlor or, if the settlor is dead or lacks capacity, to a qualified beneficiary; and

inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-702. Trustee's bond.

A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee's duties only if a court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not dispensed with the requirement.

A court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. A court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

A regulated financial service institution qualified to do trust business in this State need not give bond, even if required by the terms of the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-703. Cotrustees.

Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by majority decision.

If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee's function unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to another trustee.

If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function the settlor reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a trustee who does not join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.

Each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:

prevent a cotrustee from committing a serious breach of trust; and

compel a cotrustee to redress a serious breach of trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-704. Vacancy in trusteeship — Appointment of successor.

A vacancy in a trusteeship occurs if:

If one (1) or more cotrustees remain in office, a vacancy in a trusteeship need not be filled. A vacancy in a trusteeship must be filled if the trust has no remaining trustee.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a noncharitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

by a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

by a person appointed by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries; or

by a person appointed by a court.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a charitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

by a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

by a person selected by the charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of the trust if the Attorney General concurs in the selection; or

by a person appointed by a court.

Whether or not a vacancy in a trusteeship exists or is required to be filled, a court may appoint an additional trustee or special fiduciary whenever the court considers the appointment necessary for the administration of the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-705. Resignation of trustee.

A trustee may resign:

upon at least thirty (30) days' notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or

with the approval of a court.

In approving a resignation, a court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee's bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee's resignation.

Subsection (a) applies only to irrevocable trusts created on or after September 1, 2005, and to revocable trusts which become irrevocable on or after September 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-706. Removal of trustee.

The settlor, a cotrustee, or a beneficiary may request the court to remove a trustee, or a trustee may be removed by the court on its own initiative.

A court may remove a trustee if:

the trustee has committed a serious breach of trust;

lack of cooperation among cotrustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

because of unfitness, unwillingness, or persistent failure of the trustee to administer the trust effectively, the court determines that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of the beneficiaries; or

there has been a substantial change of circumstances or removal is requested by all of the qualified beneficiaries, the court finds that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of all of the beneficiaries and is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, and a suitable cotrustee or successor trustee is available.

Pending a final decision on a request to remove a trustee, or in lieu of or in addition to removing a trustee, the court may order such appropriate relief under §28-73-1001(b) as may be necessary to protect the trust property or the interests of the beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-707. Delivery of property by former trustee.

Unless a cotrustee remains in office or a court otherwise orders, and until the trust property is delivered to a successor trustee or other person entitled to it, a trustee who has resigned or been removed has the duties of a trustee and the powers necessary to protect the trust property.

A trustee who has resigned or been removed shall proceed expeditiously to deliver the trust property within the trustee's possession to the cotrustee, successor trustee, or other person entitled to it.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-708. Compensation of trustee.

If the terms of a trust do not specify the trustee's compensation, a trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

If the terms of a trust specify the trustee's compensation, the trustee is entitled to be compensated as specified, but the court may allow more or less compensation if:

the duties of the trustee are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

the compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-709. Reimbursement of expenses.

A trustee is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with interest as appropriate, for:

expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust; and

to the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust, expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust gives rise to a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement with reasonable interest.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 8

— Duties and Powers of Trustee

28-73-801. Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.